Wisconsin, session 2025, AB359.
do enact as follows:AB359,11Section 1. 51.608 of the statutes is created to read:AB359,2,2251.608 Conversion therapy prohibited. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB359,2,73(a) 1. “Conversion therapy” means any intervention or method that has the 4purpose of attempting to change an individual’s sexual orientation or gender 5identity, including any intervention or method that attempts to change behaviors or 6expressions of self or to reduce sexual or romantic attractions or feelings toward 7individuals of the same gender.AB359,2,1782. “Conversion therapy” does not include counseling that assists an individual 9who is seeking to undergo a gender transition or who is in the process of undergoing 10a gender transition, counseling that provides an individual with acceptance, 11support, or understanding, or counseling that facilitates an individual’s coping, 12social support, and identity exploration or development. “Conversion therapy” does 13not include counseling in the form of sexual orientation-neutral or gender identity-14neutral interventions provided for the purpose of preventing or addressing 15unlawful conduct or unsafe sexual practices, but only if the counseling is not 16provided for the purpose of attempting to change the individual’s sexual orientation 17or gender identity.AB359,2,1818(b) “Mental health provider” means any of the following:AB359,3,111. A physician licensed under ch. 448.AB359,3,222. A psychologist licensed under ch. 455.AB359,3,333. A marriage and family therapist licensed under s. 457.10 or 457.11.AB359,3,444. A professional counselor licensed under s. 457.12 or 457.13.AB359,3,555. Any social worker who holds a license or certificate granted under ch. 457.AB359,3,766. A person who is practicing under a valid training or temporary license or 7certificate granted under ch. 457.AB359,3,987. A student, intern, volunteer, or other person assisting or acting under the 9direction of an individual described in subds. 1. to 6.AB359,3,1110(2) Conversion therapy prohibited. No mental health provider may 11engage in conversion therapy with an individual who is under 18 years of age.AB359,212Section 2. 448.02 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:AB359,3,1413448.02 (3m) Investigation; hearing; action for prohibited conversion 14therapy. Notwithstanding sub. (3):AB359,3,1915(a) The board shall investigate allegations that any person holding a license or 16certificate granted by the board has violated s. 51.608 (2). After an investigation, if 17the board finds that there is probable cause to believe that the person violated s. 1851.608 (2), the board shall hold a hearing on such conduct. The board shall render 19a decision within 60 days after the date on which the hearing is held.AB359,3,2120(b) After a hearing under par. (a), if the board determines that the person has 21violated s. 51.608 (2), the board shall do one or more of the following:AB359,3,22221. Limit the person’s license or certificate.AB359,3,23232. Suspend the person’s license or certificate.AB359,4,113. Revoke the person’s license or certificate.AB359,4,72(c) The board may condition the removal of limitations on a license or 3certificate imposed under this subsection or the restoration of a license that was 4suspended or revoked under this subsection upon obtaining minimum results 5specified by the board on a professional competency examination if the board 6believes that obtaining the minimum results is related to correcting the basis upon 7which the limitation, suspension, or revocation was imposed.AB359,4,168(d) A person whose license or certificate is limited under this subsection shall 9be permitted to continue to practice upon the condition that the person will refrain 10from engaging in unprofessional conduct; that the person will occasionally appear 11before the board or its officers or agents at such times and places as may be 12designated by the board; that the person will fully disclose to the board or its 13officers or agents the nature of the person’s practice and conduct; that the person 14will fully comply with the limits placed on his or her practice and conduct by the 15board; that the person will obtain additional training, education, or supervision 16required by the board; and that the person will cooperate with the board.AB359,4,2317(e) Unless a license or certificate that is suspended under this subsection is 18revoked during the period of suspension, upon the expiration of the period of 19suspension, the license or certificate shall again become operative and effective. 20However, the board may require the holder of any such suspended license or 21certificate to pass any examination required for the original grant of the license or 22certificate before allowing such suspended license or certificate again to become 23operative and effective.AB359,5,31(f) The board shall comply with rules of procedure for the investigation, 2hearing, and action under this subsection that are promulgated under ss. 440.03 (1) 3and 448.40.AB359,34Section 3. 448.02 (9) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:AB359,5,105448.02 (9) Judicial review. (intro.) No injunction, temporary injunction, 6stay, restraining order or other order may be issued by a court in any proceeding for 7review that suspends or stays an order of the board to discipline a physician under 8sub. (3) (c) or (3m) (b) or to suspend or limit a physician’s license under sub. (4), 9except upon application to the court and a determination by the court that all of the 10following conditions are met:AB359,411Section 4. 455.09 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB359,5,1612455.09 (1m) Notwithstanding sub. (1), and subject to the rules promulgated 13under s. 440.03 (1), upon a finding that a licensee, a holder of authority to practice 14interjurisdictional telepsychology, or a holder of temporary authorization to 15practice has violated s. 51.608 (2), the examining board shall do one or more of the 16following:AB359,5,1717(a) Limit the person’s license or authorization.AB359,5,1818(b) Suspend the person’s license or authorization.AB359,5,1919(c) Revoke the person’s license or authorization.AB359,520Section 5. 457.26 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:AB359,6,621457.26 (1m) Notwithstanding sub. (1), and subject to the rules promulgated 22under s. 440.03 (1), the appropriate section of the examining board shall investigate 23any allegation that a credential holder has violated s. 51.608 (2). After an 1investigation, if the appropriate section of the examining board determines that 2there is probable cause to believe that the credential holder has violated s. 51.608 3(2), the appropriate section of the examining board shall conduct a hearing on such 4conduct. If, after a hearing, the appropriate section of the examining board finds 5that the credential holder has violated s. 51.608 (2), the appropriate section of the 6examining board shall do one or more of the following:AB359,6,77(a) Limit the person’s credential.AB359,6,88(b) Suspend the person’s credential.AB359,6,99(c) Revoke the person’s credential.AB359,6,1010